District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.47

Articles of incorporation — Contents.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 198, ch. 269, § 47
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.47.
1981 Ed., § 29-347.
1973 Ed., § 29-921a.